New York, session 2025-2026, A8116.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 2799-ggg of the public authori- 2 ties law, as added by chapter 463 of the laws of 2011, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 12. to appoint such officers, employees and agents as the authority 5 may require for the performance of its duties, and to fix and determine 6 their qualifications, duties, and compensation subject to the provisions 7 of the civil service law and any applicable collective bargaining agree- 8 ment, and to retain or employ counsel, auditors, engineers and private 9 consultants on a contract basis or otherwise for rendering professional, 10 management or technical services and advice; which positions, with the 11 exception of all police positions, shall be in the exempt class of civil 12 service; 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11638-02-5